English
Dutch
Spanish
Italian
French
German
Privacy Policy
Effective date: November 06, 2018
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. ("us", "we", or "our") operates the Fancy Cakes mobile application (hereinafter referred to as the "Service").
This page informs you of our policies regarding the collection, use and disclosure of personal data when you use our Service and the choices you have associated with that data. This Privacy Policy is managed by
Privacy Policy Generator
.
We use your data to provide and improve the Service. By using the Service, you agree to the collection and use of information in accordance with this policy. Unless otherwise defined in this Privacy Policy, the terms used in this Privacy Policy have the same meanings as in our Terms and Conditions.
Definitions
Service
Service is the Fancy Cakes mobile application operated by Trimecore Sp. z o.o.
Personal Data
Personal Data means data about a living individual who can be identified from those data (or from those and other information either in our possession or likely to come into our possession).
Usage Data
Usage Data is data collected automatically either generated by the use of the Service or from the Service infrastructure itself (for example, the duration of a page visit).
Cookies
Cookies are small files stored on your device (computer or mobile device).
Information Collection and Use
We collect several different types of information for various purposes to provide and improve our Service to you.
Types of Data Collected
Personal Data
While using our Service, we may ask you to provide us with certain personally identifiable information that can be used to contact or identify you ("Personal Data"). Personally identifiable information may include, but is not limited to:
Cookies and Usage Data
Usage Data
When you access the Service with a mobile device, we may collect certain information automatically, including, but not limited to, the type of mobile device you use, your mobile device unique ID, the IP address of your mobile device, your mobile operating system, the type of mobile Internet browser you use, unique device identifiers and other diagnostic data ("Usage Data").
Tracking & Cookies Data
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to track the activity on our Service and we hold certain information.
Cookies are files with a small amount of data which may include an anonymous unique identifier. Cookies are sent to your browser from a website and stored on your device. Other tracking technologies are also used such as beacons, tags and scripts to collect and track information and to improve and analyse our Service.
You can instruct your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, if you do not accept cookies, you may not be able to use some portions of our Service.
Examples of Cookies we use:
Session Cookies.
We use Session Cookies to operate our Service.
Preference Cookies.
We use Preference Cookies to remember your preferences and various settings.
Security Cookies.
We use Security Cookies for security purposes.
Use of Data
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. uses the collected data for various purposes:
To provide and maintain our Service
To notify you about changes to our Service
To allow you to participate in interactive features of our Service when you choose to do so
To provide customer support
To gather analysis or valuable information so that we can improve our Service
To monitor the usage of our Service
To detect, prevent and address technical issues
Transfer of Data
Your information, including Personal Data, may be transferred to - and maintained on - computers located outside of your state, province, country or other governmental jurisdiction where the data protection laws may differ from those of your jurisdiction.
If you are located outside  and choose to provide information to us, please note that we transfer the data, including Personal Data, to  and process it there.
Your consent to this Privacy Policy followed by your submission of such information represents your agreement to that transfer.
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. will take all the steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your data is treated securely and in accordance with this Privacy Policy and no transfer of your Personal Data will take place to an organisation or a country unless there are adequate controls in place including the security of your data and other personal information.
Disclosure of Data
Legal Requirements
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. may disclose your Personal Data in the good faith belief that such action is necessary to:
To comply with a legal obligation
To protect and defend the rights or property of Trimecore Sp. z o.o.
To prevent or investigate possible wrongdoing in connection with the Service
To protect the personal safety of users of the Service or the public
To protect against legal liability
Security of Data
The security of your data is important to us but remember that no method of transmission over the Internet or method of electronic storage is 100% secure. While we strive to use commercially acceptable means to protect your Personal Data, we cannot guarantee its absolute security.
Service Providers
We may employ third party companies and individuals to facilitate our Service ("Service Providers"), provide the Service on our behalf, perform Service-related services or assist us in analysing how our Service is used.
These third parties have access to your Personal Data only to perform these tasks on our behalf and are obligated not to disclose or use it for any other purpose.
Analytics
We may use third-party Service Providers to monitor and analyse the use of our Service.
Google Analytics
Google Analytics is a web analytics service offered by Google that tracks and reports website traffic. Google uses the data collected to track and monitor the use of our Service. This data is shared with other Google services. Google may use the collected data to contextualise and personalise the ads of its own advertising network.
You may opt-out of certain Google Analytics features through your mobile device settings, such as your device advertising settings or by following the instructions provided by Google in their Privacy Policy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
For more information on the privacy practices of Google, please visit the Google Privacy & Terms web page:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Unity Analytics
Unity Analytics is provided by Unity Technologies.
For more information on what type of information Unity Analytics collects, please visit their Privacy Policy page:
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy
Links to Other Sites
Our Service may contain links to other sites that are not operated by us. If you click a third party link, you will be directed to that third party's site. We strongly advise you to review the Privacy Policy of every site you visit.
We have no control over and assume no responsibility for the content, privacy policies or practices of any third party sites or services.
Children's Privacy
Our Service does not address anyone under the age of 18 ("Children").
We do not knowingly collect personally identifiable information from anyone under the age of 18. If you are a parent or guardian and you are aware that your Child has provided us with Personal Data, please contact us. If we become aware that we have collected Personal Data from children without verification of parental consent, we take steps to remove that information from our servers.
Changes to This Privacy Policy
We may update our Privacy Policy from time to time. We will notify you of any changes by posting the new Privacy Policy on this page.
We will let you know via email and/or a prominent notice on our Service, prior to the change becoming effective and update the "effective date" at the top of this Privacy Policy.
You are advised to review this Privacy Policy periodically for any changes. Changes to this Privacy Policy are effective when they are posted on this page.
Contact Us
If you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, please contact us:
By email: support@trimecore.com
Privacybeleid
Ingangsdatum: November 06, 2018
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. ("ons", "wij" of "onze") beheert de Fancy Cakes mobiele App ("hierna genoemd Dienst").
Deze pagina bevat informatie over ons beleid met betrekking tot de verzameling, het gebruik en de openbaarmaking van uw persoonsgegevens wanneer u onze Dienst gebruikt en de keuzes die u hebt met betrekking tot die gegevens. Dit privacybeleid wordt beheerd door
Privacy Policy Generator
.
Wij gebruiken uw gegevens om de Dienst te leveren en te verbeteren. Wanneer u de Dienst gebruikt, gaat u akkoord met de verzameling en het gebruik van informatie in overeenstemming met dit beleid. Tenzij anders bepaald in dit Privacybeleid heeft de terminologie die wordt gebruikt in dit Privacybeleid dezelfde betekenis als in onze Algemene voorwaarden.
Definities
Dienst
Onder dienst verstaan wij de Fancy Cakes mobiele App beheerd door Trimecore Sp. z o.o.
Gebruiksgegevens
Onder gebruiksgegevens verstaan wij automatisch verzamelde gegevens die worden gegenereerd door het gebruik van de Dienst of van de infrastructuur van de Dienst zelf (bijvoorbeeld, de duur van het bezoek aan een pagina).
Gebruiksgegevens
Onder gebruiksgegevens verstaan wij automatisch verzamelde gegevens die worden gegenereerd door het gebruik van de Dienst of van de infrastructuur van de Dienst zelf (bijvoorbeeld, de duur van het bezoek aan een pagina).
Cookies
Cookies zijn informatiebestandjes die worden opgeslagen op uw apparaat (computer of mobiele apparaat).
Gegevensverzameling en gebruik
Wij verzamelen verschillende soorten gegevens voor uiteenlopende doeleinden om onze Dienst aan u te kunnen leveren en om hem te verbeteren.
Soorten gegevens die worden verzameld
Persoonsgegevens
Wanneer u onze Dienst gebruikt, kunnen wij u vragen ons bepaalde persoonlijk identificeerbare informatie te verstrekken die kan worden gebruikt om contact op te nemen met u of om u te identificeren ("Persoonsgegevens"). Deze persoonlijk identificeerbare informatie kan omvatten maar is niet beperkt tot:
Cookies en Gebruiksgegevens
Gebruiksgegevens
Wanneer u toegang krijgt tot de Dienst met of via een mobiele apparaat kunnen wij bepaalde gegevens automatisch verzamelen, inclusief, maar niet beperkt tot, het mobiele apparaat dat u gebruikt, de unieke ID van uw mobiele apparaat, het IP-adres van uw mobiele apparaat, uw mobiel besturingssysteem, de mobiele internetbrowser die u gebruikt, de unieke apparaat-ID en andere diagnostische gegevens ("Gebruiksgegevens").
Tracking & cookiegegevens
Wij gebruiken cookies en soortgelijke volgtechnologieën om de activiteit op onze Dienst te volgen en we bewaren bepaalde informatie.
Cookies zijn bestanden met een kleine hoeveelheid gegevens die een anonieme unieke ID kunnen bevatten. Cookies worden van een website verzonden naar uw browser en opgeslagen op uw apparaat. Er worden ook andere volgtechnologieën gebruikt zoals beacons, tags en scripts om gegevens te verzamelen en te volgen en om onze Dienst te verbeteren en te analyseren.
U kunt uw browser instellen om alle cookies te weigeren of om aan te geven wanneer een cookie wordt verzonden. Maar als u geen cookies aanvaardt, kunt u mogelijk niet alle functies van onze Dienst gebruiken.
Voorbeelden van cookies die wij gebruiken:
Sessiecookies.
Wij gebruiken Sessiecookies om onze Dienst te beheren.
Voorkeurcookies.
Wij gebruiken Voorkeurcookies om uw voorkeuren en uiteenlopende instellingen bij te houden.
Veiligheidscookies.
Wij gebruiken Veiligheidscookies voor veiligheidsdoeleinden.
Gebruik van gegevens
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. gebruikt de verzamelde gegevens voor uiteenlopende doeleinden:
Om onze Dienst te leveren en te onderhouden
Om u wijzigingen in onze Dienst te melden
Om u de mogelijkheid te bieden om, indien gewenst, deel te nemen aan de interactieve functies van onze Dienst
Om onze klanten steun te verlenen
Om analyse- of waardevolle gegevens te verzamelen die we kunnen toepassen om onze Dienst te verbeteren
Om toezicht te houden op het gebruik van onze Dienst
Om technische problemen te detecteren, te voorkomen en te behandelen
Overdracht van gegevens
Uw gegevens, inclusief Persoonsgegevens, kunnen worden overgedragen naar - en bewaard op - computers die zich buiten het rechtsgebied van uw provincie, land of een andere overheidsinstantie bevinden waar de wetgeving inzake gegevensbescherming kan verschillen van de wetgeving in uw rechtsgebied.
Let erop dat, als u zich buiten  bevindt en u ons gegevens verstrekt, wij deze gegevens, inclusief Persoonsgegevens, overdragen naar  en ze daar verwerken.
Uw instemming met dit Privacybeleid gevolgd door uw indiening van dergelijke gegevens geven aan dat u akkoord gaat met die overdracht.
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. zal alle redelijkerwijs noodzakelijke stappen ondernemen om ervoor te zorgen dat uw gegevens veilig en in overeenstemming met dit Privacybeleid worden behandeld en dat uw Persoonsgegevens nooit worden overgedragen aan een organisatie of een land als er geen gepaste controles zijn ingesteld, inclusief de veiligheid van uw gegevens en andere persoonsgegevens.
Openbaarmaking van gegevens
Wettelijke vereisten
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. kan uw Persoonsgegevens openbaar maken als het te goeder trouw de mening is toegedaan dat een dergelijke handeling noodzakelijk is:
Om te voldoen aan een wettelijke verplichting
Om de rechten en eigendom van Trimecore Sp. z o.o. te beschermen en te verdedigen
Om mogelijke misstanden te voorkomen of te onderzoeken in verband met de Dienst
Om de persoonlijke veiligheid van gebruikers van de Dienst of het publiek te beschermen
Als bescherming tegen juridische aansprakelijkheid
Veiligheid van gegevens
De veiligheid van uw gegevens is belangrijk voor ons, maar vergeet niet dat geen enkele methode van verzending via het internet of elektronische methode van opslag 100% veilig is. Hoewel wij ernaar streven commercieel aanvaardbare middelen toe te passen om uw Persoonsgegevens te beschermen, kunnen wij de absolute veiligheid niet waarborgen.
Dienstverleners
Wij kunnen externe bedrijven en personen aanstellen om onze Dienst ("Dienstverleners") te vereenvoudigen, om de Dienst te leveren in onze naam, om diensten uit te voeren in het kader van onze Dienst of om ons te helpen bij de analyse van hoe onze Dienst wordt gebruikt.
Deze externe partijen hebben enkel toegang tot uw Persoonsgegevens om deze taken uit te voeren in onze naam en zij mogen deze niet openbaar maken aan anderen of ze gebruiken voor andere doeleinden.
Analytics
Wij kunnen beroep doen op externe Dienstverleners om het gebruik van onze Dienst te volgen en te analyseren.
Google Analytics
Google Analytics is een webanalyse-service van Google die het websiteverkeer volgt en rapporteert. Google gebruikt de verzamelde gegevens om het gebruik van onze Dienst te volgen en bij te houden. Deze gegevens worden gedeeld met andere Google diensten. Google kan de verzamelde gegevens gebruiken om de advertenties van zijn eigen advertentienetwerk te contextualiseren en te personaliseren.
U kunt zich afmelden van bepaalde Google Analytics functies in de instellingen van uw mobiele apparaat, zoals de reclame-instellingen van uw apparaat of door de instructies te volgen van Google in hun Privacybeleid:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Voor meer informatie over de privacypraktijken van Google verwijzen wij u naar de internetpagina van Google Privacy en voorwaarden:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Unity Analytics
De Unity Analytics dienst wordt geleverd door Unity Technologies.
Voor meer informatie over het type informatie dat Unity Analytics verzamelt, verwijzen wij u naar hun Privacybeleid pagina:
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy
Links naar andere sites
Onze Dienst kan links bevatten naar andere sites die niet door ons worden beheerd. Als u klikt op een link van een externe partij wordt u naar de site van die externe partij gebracht. Wij raden u sterk aan het Privacybeleid te verifiëren van elke site die u bezoekt.
Wij hebben geen controle over en aanvaarden geen aansprakelijkheid met betrekking tot de inhoud, het privacybeleid of de privacypraktijken van de sites of diensten van een externe partij.
Privacy van kinderen
Onze dienst richt zich niet op personen die jonger zijn dan 18 ("Kinderen").
Wij verzamelen nooit bewust persoonlijk identificeerbare informatie van iemand die jonger is dan 18 jaar oud. Als u een ouder of voogd bent en u stelt vast dat uw kind ons persoonsgegevens heeft geleverd, vragen wij u contact op te nemen met ons. Als u vaststelt dat wij persoonsgegevens hebben verzameld van kinderen zonder de verificatie van ouderlijk toezicht zullen wij de nodige stappen ondernemen om die informatie te verwijderen van onze servers.
Wijzigingen aan dit Privacybeleid
Wij kunnen ons Privacybeleid op gezette tijden bijwerken. Wij zullen u op de hoogte brengen van eventuele wijzigingen door het nieuwe Privacybeleid te publiceren op deze pagina.
Wij zullen u op de hoogte brengen via e-mail en/of een duidelijke melding op onze Dienst voor de wijzigingen van kracht gaan en wij zullen de "aanvangsdatum" bijwerken die vermeld staat bovenaan in dit Privacybeleid.
Wij raden u aan dit Privacybeleid regelmatig te controleren op eventuele wijzigingen. Wijzigingen aan dit Privacybeleid gaan van kracht op het moment dat ze worden gepubliceerd op deze pagina.
Contact opnemen
Als u vragen hebt over dit Privacybeleid kunt u contact opnemen met ons:
Via email: support@trimecore.com
Política de privacidad
Fecha efectiva: November 06, 2018
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. ("nosotros", "a nosotros", "nuestro") opera la aplicación móvil Fancy Cakes (en adelante, el "Servicio").
Esta página le informa de nuestras políticas en materia de recopilación, uso y divulgación de datos personales cuando utiliza nuestro Servicio y de las opciones de las que dispone en relación con esos datos. Esta Política de privacidad es administrada por
Privacy Policy Generator
.
Utilizamos sus datos para prestarle el Servicio y mejorarlo. Al utilizar el Servicio, usted acepta la recopilación y el uso de información de conformidad con esta política. A menos que esta Política de privacidad defina lo contrario, los términos utilizados en ella tienen los mismos significados que nuestros Términos y Condiciones.
Definiciones
Servicio
Servicio es la aplicación móvil Fancy Cakes operada por Trimecore Sp. z o.o.
Datos personales
Datos personales significa los datos sobre una persona física viva que puede ser identificada a partir de esos datos (o con esos datos y otra información de la que dispongamos o probablemente podamos disponer).
Datos de uso
Datos de uso son los datos recopilados automáticamente, generados por el uso del Servicio o por la propia infraestructura del Servicio (por ejemplo, la duración de la visita a una página).
Cookies
Las cookies son pequeños archivos ialmacenados en su dispositivo (ordenador o dispositivo móvil).
Recopilación y uso de la información
Recopilamos diferentes tipos de información con diversas finalidades para prestarle el Servicio y mejorarlo.
Tipos de datos recopilados
Datos personales
Cuando utilice nuestro Servicio, es posible que le pidamos que nos proporcione determinada información personalmente identificable que podrá ser utilizada para contactar con usted o para identificarle ("Datos personales"). La información personalmente identificable puede incluir, entre otras, la siguiente:
Cookies y datos de uso
Datos de uso
Cuando accede al Servicio econ un dispositivo móvil, podemos recopilar determinada información automáticamente, incluyendo, entre otros, el tipo de dispositivo móvil que utiliza, el identificador exclusivo de su dispositivo móvil, la dirección de IP de su dispositivo móvil, el sistema operativo de su dispositivo móvil, el tipo de navegador de Internet que utiliza su dispositivo móvil, identificadores exclusivos de dispositivos y otros datos de diagnóstico ("Datos de uso").
Datos de cookies y seguimiento
Utilizamos cookies y tecnologías de seguimiento similares para rastrear la actividad de nuestro Servicio y mantener determinada información.
Las cookies son archivos con una pequeña cantidad de datos que pueden incluir un identificador exclusivo anónimo. Las cookies son enviadas a su navegador desde un sitio web y se almacenan en su dispositivo. Otras tecnologías de seguimiento también utilizadas son balizas, etiquetas y scripts para recopilar y rastrear la información, así como para mejorar y analizar nuestro Servicio.
Usted puede ordenar a su navegador que rechace todas las cookies o que le avise cuando se envía una cookie. Sin embargo, si no acepta cookies, es posible que no pueda utilizar algunas partes de nuestro Servicio.
Ejemplos de Cookies que utilizamos:
Cookies de sesión.
Utilizamos Cookies de sesión para operar nuestro Servicio.
Cookies de preferencia.
Utilizamos Cookies de preferencia para recordar sus preferencias y diversos ajustes.
Cookies de seguridad.
Utilizamos Cookies de seguridad para fines de seguridad.
Uso de datos
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. utiliza los datos recopilados con diversas finalidades:
Suministrar y mantener nuestro Servicio
Notificarle cambios en nuestro Servicio
Permitirle participar en funciones interactivas de nuestro Servicio cuando decida hacerlo
Prestar asistencia al cliente
Recopilar análisis o información valiosa que nos permitan mejorar nuestro Servicio
Controlar el uso de nuestro Servicio
Detectar, evitar y abordar problemas técnicos
Transferencia de datos
Su información, incluyendo Datos personales, puede ser transferida a —y mantenida en— ordenadores localizados fuera de su estado, provincia, país u otra jurisdicción gubernamental donde las leyes de protección de datos pueden diferir de las de su jurisdicción.
Si usted se encuentra fuera de  y decide facilitarnos información, tenga en cuenta que nosotros transferimos los datos, incluyendo Datos personales, a  y que los tratamos allí.
Su aceptación de esta Política de privacidad seguida de su envío de esta información representa que está de acuerdo con dicha transferencia.
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. emprenderá todas las medidas razonables necesarias para garantizar que sus datos sean tratados de forma segura y de conformidad con esta Política de privacidad y no se realizará ninguna transferencia de sus Datos personales a una organización o país, salvo que existan unos controles adecuados establecidos incluyendo la seguridad de sus datos y otra información personal.
Divulgación de datos
Requisitos legales
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. puede divulgar sus Datos personales de buena fe cuando considere que esta acción es necesaria para lo siguiente:
Cumplir una obligación legal
Proteger y defender los derechos o bienes de Trimecore Sp. z o.o.
Prevenir o investigar posibles infracciones en relación con el Servicio
Proteger la seguridad personal de usuarios del Servicio o del público
Protegerse frente a consecuencias legales
Seguridad de los datos
La seguridad de sus datos es importante para nosotros, pero recuerde que ningún método de transmisión por Internet o método de  almacenamiento electrónico resulta 100% seguro. A pesar de que nos esforzamos por utilizar medios comercialmente aceptables para proteger sus Datos personales, no podemos garantizar su seguridad absoluta.
Proveedores de servicios
Podemos contratar a personas físicas y jurídicas terceras para facilitar nuestro Servicio ("Proveedores de servicios"), para que presten el Servicio en nuestro nombre, para que suministren servicios relacionados con el Servicio o para que nos ayuden a analizar cómo se utiliza nuestro Servicio.
Estos terceros tienen acceso a sus Datos personales únicamente para realizar estas tareas en nuestro nombre y están obligados a no divulgarlos ni utilizarlos con ningún otro fin.
Análisis
Podemos utilizar Proveedores de servicios terceros para controlar y analizar el uso de nuestro Servicio.
Google Analytics
Google Analytics es un servicio de analítica web ofrecido por Google que rastrea e informa del tráfico de los sitios web. Google utiliza los datos recopilados para rastrear y controlar el uso de nuestro Servicio. Estos datos son compartidos con otros servicios de Google. Google puede utilizar los datos recopilados para contextualizar y personalizar los anuncios de su propia red de publicidad.
Puede optar por inhabilitar determinadas características de Google Analytics a través de la configuración de su dispositivo móvil, como la configuración de la publicidad en el dispositivo, o siguiendo las instrucciones proporcionadas por Google en su Política de privacidad:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Para más información sobre las prácticas de privacidad de Google, visite la página web de Privacidad y Condiciones de Google:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Unity Analytics
Unity Analytics es operado por Unity Technologies.
Para más información sobre el tipo de datos que recopila Unity Analytics, visite la página de su Política de privacidad:
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy
Enlaces a otros sitios
Nuestro Servicio puede contener enlaces a otros sitios no operados por nosotros. Si hace clic en el enlace de un tercero, será dirigido al sitio de ese tercero. Le recomendamos encarecidamente que revise la Política de privacidad de todos los sitios que visite.
No tenemos ningún control ni asumimos responsabilidad alguna con respecto al contenido, las políticas o prácticas de privacidad de sitios o servicios de terceros.
Privacidad del menor
Nuestro servicio no está dirigido a ningún menor de 18 años (en adelante, "Menor").
No recopilamos de forma consciente información personalmente identificable de menores de 18 años. Si es usted un padre/madre o tutor y tiene conocimiento de que su hijo nos ha facilitado Datos personales, contacte con nosotros. Si tenemos conocimiento de que hemos recopilado Datos personales de menores sin verificación del consentimiento parental, tomamos medidas para eliminar esa información de nuestros servidores.
Cambios en esta Política de privacidad
Podemos actualizar nuestra Política de privacidad periódicamente. Le notificaremos cualquier cambio publicando la nueva Política de privacidad en esta página.
Le informaremos a través del e-mail y/o de un aviso destacado sobre nuestro Servicio antes de que el cambio entre en vigor y actualizaremos la «fecha efectiva» en la parte superior de esta Política de privacidad.
Le recomendamos que revise esta Política de privacidad periódicamente para comprobar si se ha introducido algún cambio. Los cambios en esta Política de privacidad entran en vigor cuando se publican en esta página.
Contacte con nosotros
Si tiene alguna pregunta sobre esta Política de privacidad, contacte con nosotros:
Por e-mail: support@trimecore.com
Informativa sulla Privacy
Data di entrata in vigore: November 06, 2018
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. ("noi" o "nostro") gestisce il Fancy Cakes l'applicazione per dispositivi mobili (in appresso il "Servizio").
Questa pagina vi informa delle nostre politiche riguardanti la raccolta, l'uso e la divulgazione dei dati personali quando usate il nostro Servizio e le scelte che avete associato a quei dati. Questa Informativa sulla privacy è gestita da
Privacy Policy Generator
.
Utilizziamo i vostri dati per fornire e migliorare il Servizio. Utilizzando il Servizio, accettate la raccolta e l'utilizzo delle informazioni in conformità con questa informativa. Se non diversamente definito nella presente Informativa sulla privacy, i termini utilizzati nella presente Informativa hanno la stessa valenza dei nostri Termini e condizioni.
Definizioni
Servizio
Il Servizio è l'applicazione per dispositivi mobili Fancy Cakes gestita dalla Trimecore Sp. z o.o.
Dati personali
I Dati personali sono i dati di un individuo vivente che può essere identificato da quei dati (o da quelli e altre informazioni in nostro possesso o che potrebbero venire in nostro possesso).
Dati di utilizzo
I dati di utilizzo sono i dati raccolti automaticamente generati dall'utilizzo del Servizio o dall'infrastruttura del Servizio stesso (ad esempio, la durata della visita di una pagina).
Cookies
I cookie sono piccoli file memorizzati sul vostro dispositivo (computer o dispositivo mobile).
Raccolta e uso delle informazioni
Raccogliamo diversi tipi di informazioni per vari scopi, per fornire e migliorare il nostro servizio.
Tipologie di Dati raccolti
Dati personali
Durante l'utilizzo del nostro Servizio, potremmo chiedervi di fornirci alcune informazioni di identificazione personale che possono essere utilizzate per contattarvi o identificarvi ("Dati personali"). Le informazioni di identificazione personale possono includere, ma non sono limitate a:
Cookie e dati di utilizzo
Dati di utilizzo
Quando si accede al Servizio attraverso un dispositivo mobile, potremmo raccogliere automaticamente alcune informazioni, inclusi, ma non solo, il tipo di dispositivo mobile che si utilizza, l'ID univoco del dispositivo mobile, l'indirizzo IP del dispositivo mobile, il sistema operativo mobile, il tipo di browser Internet mobile che utilizzate, identificatori di dispositivo univoci e altri dati diagnostici ("Dati di utilizzo").
Tracciamento; dati dei cookie
Utilizziamo cookie e tecnologie di tracciamento simili per tracciare l'attività sul nostro Servizio e conservare determinate informazioni.
I cookie sono file con una piccola quantità di dati che possono includere un identificatore univoco anonimo. I cookie vengono inviati al vostro browser da un sito web e memorizzati sul vostro dispositivo. Altre tecnologie di tracciamento utilizzate sono anche beacon, tag e script per raccogliere e tenere traccia delle informazioni e per migliorare e analizzare il nostro Servizio.
Potete chiedere al vostro browser di rifiutare tutti i cookie o di indicare quando viene inviato un cookie. Tuttavia, se non si accettano i cookie, potrebbe non essere possibile utilizzare alcune parti del nostro Servizio.
Esempi di cookie che utilizziamo:
Cookie di sessione.
Utilizziamo i cookie di sessione per gestire il nostro servizio.
Cookie di preferenza.
Utilizziamo i cookie di preferenza per ricordare le vostre preferenze e varie impostazioni.
Cookie di sicurezza.
Utilizziamo i cookie di sicurezza per motivi di sicurezza.
Uso dei dati
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. utilizza i dati raccolti per vari scopi:
Per fornire e mantenere il nostro Servizio
Per comunicare agli utenti variazioni apportate al servizio che offriamo
Per permettere agli utenti di fruire, a propria discrezione, di funzioni interattive del nostro servizio
Per fornire un servizio ai clienti
Per raccogliere analisi o informazioni preziose in modo da poter migliorare il nostro Servizio
Per monitorare l'utilizzo del nostro Servizio
Per rilevare, prevenire e affrontare problemi tecnici
Trasferimento dei dati
Le vostre informazioni, compresi i Dati personali, possono essere trasferite a - e mantenute su - computer situati al di fuori del vostro stato, provincia, nazione o altra giurisdizione governativa dove le leggi sulla protezione dei dati possono essere diverse da quelle della vostra giurisdizione.
Se ci si trova al di fuori di  e si sceglie di fornire informazioni a noi, si ricorda che trasferiamo i dati, compresi i dati personali, in  e li elaboriamo lì.
Il vostro consenso alla presente Informativa sulla privacy seguito dall'invio di tali informazioni rappresenta il vostro consenso al trasferimento.
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. adotterà tutte le misure ragionevolmente necessarie per garantire che i vostri dati siano trattati in modo sicuro e in conformità con la presente Informativa sulla privacy e nessun trasferimento dei vostri Dati Personali sarà effettuato a un'organizzazione o a un paese a meno che non vi siano controlli adeguati dei vostri dati e altre informazioni personali.
Divulgazione di dati
Prescrizioni di legge
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. può divulgare i vostri Dati personali in buona fede, ritenendo che tale azione sia necessaria per:
Rispettare un obbligo legale
Proteggere e difendere i diritti o la proprietà di Trimecore Sp. z o.o.
Prevenire o investigare possibili illeciti in relazione al Servizio
Proteggere la sicurezza personale degli utenti del Servizio o del pubblico
Proteggere contro la responsabilità legale
Sicurezza dei dati
La sicurezza dei vostri dati è importante per noi, ma ricordate che nessun metodo di trasmissione su Internet o metodo di archiviazione elettronica è sicuro al 100%. Pertanto, anche se adotteremo ogni mezzo commercialmente accettabile per proteggere i vostri Dati personali, non possiamo garantirne la sicurezza assoluta.
Fornitori di servizi
Potremmo impiegare società e individui di terze parti per facilitare il nostro Servizio ("Fornitori di servizi"), per fornire il Servizio per nostro conto, per eseguire servizi relativi ai Servizi o per aiutarci ad analizzare come viene utilizzato il nostro Servizio.
Le terze parti hanno accesso ai vostri Dati personali solo per eseguire queste attività per nostro conto e sono obbligate a non rivelarle o utilizzarle per altri scopi.
Statistiche
Potremmo utilizzare i Fornitori di servizi di terze parti per monitorare e analizzare l'utilizzo del nostro servizio.
Google Analytics
Google Analytics è un servizio di analisi web offerto da Google che tiene traccia e segnala il traffico del sito web. Google utilizza i dati raccolti per tracciare e monitorare l'utilizzo del nostro Servizio. Questi dati sono condivisi con altri servizi di Google. Google può utilizzare i dati raccolti per contestualizzare e personalizzare le inserzioni della propria rete pubblicitaria.
Potete scegliere di rinunciare ad alcune funzioni di Google Analytics tramite le impostazioni del vostro dispositivo mobile, come ad esempio le impostazioni del dispositivo di pubblicità o seguendo le istruzioni fornite da Google nella loro Informativa sulla Privacy:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Per ulteriori informazioni sulle prassi relative alla privacy di Google, vi preghiamo di visitare la pagina web con i Termini della privacy di Google:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Unity Analytics
Unity Analytics è fornito da Unity Technologies.
Per ulteriori informazioni su quale tipo di informazioni raccoglie Unity Analytics, potete visitare la loro pagina web sull'Informativa sulla Privacy:
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy
Link ad altri siti
OIl nostro servizio può contenere collegamenti ad altri siti non gestiti da noi. Cliccando su un link di terze parti, sarete indirizzati al sito di quella terza parte. Ti consigliamo vivamente di rivedere l'Informativa sulla privacy di ogni sito che visiti.
Non abbiamo alcun controllo e non ci assumiamo alcuna responsabilità per il contenuto, le politiche sulla privacy o le pratiche di qualsiasi sito o servizio di terzi.
Privacy dei minori
Il nostro servizio non si rivolge a minori di 18 anni ("Bambini").
Non raccogliamo consapevolmente informazioni personali relative a utenti di età inferiore a 18 anni. Se siete un genitore o tutore e siete consapevoli che vostro figlio ci ha fornito Dati personali, vi preghiamo di contattarci. Se veniamo a conoscenza del fatto che abbiamo raccolto Dati personali da minori senza la verifica del consenso dei genitori, adotteremo provvedimenti per rimuovere tali informazioni dai nostri server.
Modifiche alla presente informativa sulla privacy
Potremmo aggiornare periodicamente la nostra Informativa sulla privacy. Ti informeremo di eventuali modifiche pubblicando la nuova Informativa sulla privacy in questa pagina.
Vi informeremo via e-mail e / o un avviso di rilievo sul nostro Servizio, prima che la modifica diventi effettiva e aggiorneremo la "data di validità" nella parte superiore di questa Informativa sulla privacy.
Si consiglia di rivedere periodicamente la presente Informativa sulla privacy per eventuali modifiche. Le modifiche a tale informativa sulla privacy entrano in vigore nel momento in cui vengono pubblicate su questa pagina.
Contattaci
In caso di domande sulla presente Informativa sulla privacy, si prega di contattarci:
Tramite e-mail: support@trimecore.com
Politique de Confidentialité
Date de prise d'effet: November 06, 2018
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. ("nous", "notre", "nos") exploite l'application mobile Fancy Cakes (ci-après désignée par le terme "Service").
Cette page vous explique nos politiques en matière de collecte, d'utilisation et de communication des données à caractère personnel lorsque vous utilisez notre Service ainsi que les choix qui s'offrent à vous en ce qui concerne ces données. Cette politique de confidentialité est gérée par
Privacy Policy Generator
.
Nous utilisons vos données pour fournir et améliorer le Service. En utilisant le Service, vous consentez à la collecte et à l'utilisation d'informations conformément à la présente politique. Sauf définition contraire dans la présente Politique de Confidentialité, les termes utilisés dans la présente Politique de Confidentialité ont la même signification que dans nos Conditions Générales.
Définitions
Service
Par Service on entend l'application mobile Fancy Cakes exploitée par Trimecore Sp. z o.o.
Données à caractère personnel
Données à Caractère Personnel désigne des données concernant un individu vivant qui peut être identifié à partir de ces données (ou à partir de ces données et d'autres informations en notre possession ou susceptibles d'entrer en notre possession).
Données d'Utilisation
Les Données d'Utilisation sont recueillies automatiquement et sont générées soit par l'utilisation du Service, soit par l'infrastructure du Service proprement dite (par exemple, durée de consultation d'une page).
Cookies
Les cookies sont de petits fichiers enregistrés sur votre dispositif (ordinateur ou dispositif mobile).
Collecte et utilisation des données
Nous recueillons plusieurs types de données à différentes fins en vue de vous fournir notre Service et de l'améliorer.
Types de données recueillies
Données à Caractère Personnel
Lorsque vous utilisez notre Service, il est possible que nous vous demandions de nous fournir certaines données personnelles nominatives qui peuvent servir à vous contacter ou à vous identifier ("Données à Caractère Personnel"). Les données personnelles nominatives peuvent comprendre, mais de manière non limitative:
Cookies et Données d'Utilisation
Données d'Utilisation
Lorsque vous accédez au Service au moyen d'un dispositif mobile, il se peut que nous recueillions certaines informations automatiquement, y compris, mais de manière non limitative, le type de dispositif mobile que vous utilisez, l'identifiant unique de votre dispositif mobile, l'adresse IP de votre dispositif mobile, votre système d'exploitation mobile, le type de navigateur Internet mobile que vous utilisez, les identifiants uniques de dispositifs ainsi que d'autres données de diagnostic ("Données d'Utilisation").
Suivi et données de cookies
Nous avons recours à des cookies et à d'autres technologies de suivi similaires pour effectuer un suivi des activités effectuées dans notre Service, et nous conservons certaines informations.
Les cookies sont des fichiers à faible volume de données pouvant comporter un identifiant unique anonyme. Les cookies sont envoyés à votre navigateur depuis un site web et sont stockés sur votre dispositif. D'autres technologies de suivi telles que les pixels, les balises et les scripts sont également utilisées pour recueillir et suivre des informations et afin d'améliorer et d'analyser notre Service.
Vous pouvez demander à votre navigateur de refuser tous les cookies ou de vous avertir lorsqu'un cookie est envoyé. Toutefois, si vous n'acceptez pas les cookies, il se peut que vous ne puissiez pas utiliser certains éléments de notre Service.
Exemples de cookies que nous utilisons :
Cookies de Session.
Nous utilisons des Cookies de Session pour faire fonctionner notre Service.
Cookies de Préférences.
Nous utilisons des Cookies de Préférences pour mémoriser vos préférences et vos différents paramètres.
Cookies de Sécurité.
Nous utilisons des Cookies de Sécurité pour des raisons de sécurité.
Utilisation des données
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. utilise les données recueillies à des fins diverses:
Pour fournir et assurer notre Service
Pour vous faire part des changements apportés à notre Service
Pour vous permettre d'utiliser les fonctions interactives de notre Service quand vous le souhaitez
Pour assurer l'assistance client
Pour recueillir des données précieuses ou d'analyses qui nous permettront d'améliorer notre Service
Pour contrôler l'utilisation de notre Service
Pour détecter, prévenir et régler les problèmes techniques
Transfert des données
Les informations vous concernant, notamment vos Données à Caractère Personnel, peuvent être transférées de votre région, province, pays, ou autre division territoriale vers des ordinateurs – et stockées sur ces derniers – situés à un endroit où la législation relative à la protection des données diffère de celle du territoire où vous résidez.
Si vous résidez hors de/du  et que vous choisissez de nous communiquer des informations, sachez que nous transférons les données, y compris les Données à Caractère Personnel, vers le/la  et que nous les y traitons.
En acceptant la présente Politique de Confidentialité puis en soumettant ces informations, vous consentez à ce transfert.
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. prendra toutes les mesures raisonnablement nécessaires pour faire en sorte que vos données soient traitées de manière sécurisée et conformément à la présente Politique de Confidentialité et vos Données à Caractère Personnel ne seront transférées vers aucune organisation ni aucun pays à moins que des contrôles adéquats ne soient en place, notamment en ce qui concerne la sécurité de vos données et d'autres données personnelles.
Communication de données
Exigences légales
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. peut communiquer vos Données à Caractère Personnel si elle estime de bonne foi que cela est nécessaire pour:
S'acquitter d'une obligation légale
Protéger et défendre les droits ou les biens de Trimecore Sp. z o.o.
Prévenir d'éventuels actes répréhensibles ou enquêter sur de tels actes dans le cadre du Service
Assurer la sécurité personnelle des utilisateurs du Service ou du public
Se protéger contre la responsabilité civile
Sécurité des données
La sécurité de vos données nous tient à cœur. Toutefois, n'oubliez pas qu'aucune méthode de transmission de données par Internet ou méthode de stockage électronique n'est sûre à 100 %. Bien que nous nous efforcions d'utiliser des méthodes commercialement acceptables pour protéger vos Données à Caractère Personnel, nous ne pouvons pas leur garantir une sécurité absolue.
Prestataires de services
Nous pouvons faire appel à des sociétés tierces et à des tierces personnes pour faciliter la prestation de notre Service ("Prestataires de Services"), assurer le Service en notre nom, assurer des services liés au Service ou nous aider à analyser la façon dont notre Service est utilisé.
Ces tiers n'ont accès à vos Données à Caractère Personnel que pour effectuer ces tâches en notre nom et il leur est interdit de les communiquer ou de les utiliser à quelle qu'autre fin.
Analyses
Nous pouvons faire appel à des Prestataires de Services tiers pour surveiller et analyser l'utilisation de notre Service.
Google Analytics
Google Analytics est un service d'analyse web proposé par Google qui assure le suivi du trafic d'un site web et en rend compte. Google utilise les données recueillies pour suivre et surveiller l'utilisation de notre Service. Ces données sont partagées avec d'autres services Google. Google peut utiliser les données recueillies pour contextualiser et personnaliser les annonces de son propre réseau publicitaire.
Vous pouvez refuser certaines fonctionnalités de Google Analytics en utilisant les paramètres de votre dispositif mobile, par exemple ses paramètres publicitaires, ou en suivant les instructions qui figurent dans la politique de confidentialité de Google:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Pour plus de précisions sur les pratiques de confidentialité de Google, merci de consulter la page web Protection de la vie privée et conditions de Google:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Unity Analytics
Unity Analytics est fourni par Unity Technologies.
Pour plus de précisions sur le type de données recueillies par Unity Analytics, merci de consulter la page de sa politique de confidentialité:
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy
Liens pointant vers d'autres sites
Il se peut que notre Service contienne des liens pointant vers d'autres sites que nous n'exploitons pas. Si vous cliquez sur un lien de tiers, vous serez redirigé vers le site de ce tiers. Nous vous recommandons vivement d'examiner la politique de confidentialité de chacun des sites que vous consultez.
Nous n'avons aucun contrôle sur le contenu, les politiques ou pratiques de confidentialité des sites ou services de tiers et déclinons toute responsabilité en ce qui les concerne.
Vie privée des enfants
Notre Service ne s'adresse pas aux personnes de moins de 18 ans ("Enfants").
Nous ne recueillons pas sciemment de données personnelles nominatives auprès de personnes de moins de 18 ans. Si vous êtes un parent ou un tuteur et que vous savez que votre Enfant nous a communiqué des Données à Caractère Personnel, veuillez nous contacter. Si nous apprenons que nous avons recueilli des Données à Caractère Personnel auprès d'enfants sans vérifier s'il y a consentement parental, nous faisons le nécessaire pour supprimer ces informations de nos serveurs.
Modifications de la présente Politique de Confidentialité
Nous nous réservons le droit d'actualiser notre Politique de Confidentialité de temps à autre. Nous vous informerons de toute modification en publiant la nouvelle Politique de Confidentialité sur cette page.
Avant que la modification ne prenne effet, nous vous en informerons par e-mail et/ ou en plaçant un avis bien en vue dans notre Service et nous actualiserons la "date de prise d'effet" qui figure en haut de la présente Politique de Confidentialité.
Nous vous conseillons de consulter la présente Politique de Confidentialité périodiquement pour prendre connaissance de toute modification. Les modifications apportées à la présente Politique de Confidentialité prennent effet lorsqu'elles sont publiées sur cette page.
Nous contacter
Pour toute question relative à la présente Politique de Confidentialité, veuillez nous contacter:
Par courrier électronique: support@trimecore.com
Datenschutz-Richtlinie
Datum des Inkrafttretens: November 06, 2018
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. ("wir", "uns", "unser" usw.) betreibt die mobile App Fancy Cakes (nachstehend als "Dienst" bezeichnet).
Diese Seite enthält Informationen zu der Art und Weise, auf welche wir personenbezogene Daten erfassen, nutzen und offenlegen, wenn Sie unseren Dienst nutzen, sowie zu den Optionen, die Ihnen im Zusammenhang mit diesen Daten zur Verfügung stehen. Diese Datenschutzrichtlinie wird von
Privacy Policy Generator
verwaltet.
Wir nutzen Ihre Daten zur Bereitstellung und Verbesserung unseres Dienstes. Durch Inanspruchnahme des Dienstes erklären Sie sich mit der Erfassung und Nutzung von Daten durch uns nach Maßgabe dieser Richtlinie einverstanden. Soweit in dieser Datenschutz-Richtlinie nicht jeweils etwas anderes angegeben ist, kommt den in dieser Datenschutz-Richtlinie vorkommenden Begriffen jeweils dieselbe Bedeutung zu, die diesen in unseren Allgemeinen Geschäftsbedingungen (Terms and Conditions) zugewiesen wurde.
Begriffsbestimmungen
Dienst
Der Dienst ist die von dem Trimecore Sp. z o.o. betriebene mobile App Fancy Cakes
Personenbezogene Daten
Personenbezogene Daten sind Daten, die sich auf eine lebende Person beziehen, welche anhand dieser Daten (bzw. anhand dieser Daten in Kombination mit weiteren Informationen, die sich bereits in unserem Besitz befinden oder mit Wahrscheinlichkeit in unseren Besitz gelangen werden) identifizierbar ist.
Nutzungsdaten
Nutzungsdaten sind Daten, die automatisch im Rahmen der Nutzung des Dienstes oder innerhalb der Dienstinfrastruktur selbst (beispielsweise für die Dauer eines Seitenbesuchs) erfasst werden.
Cookies
Cookies sind kleine Dateien, die auf Ihrem Gerät (Computer oder mobiles Endgerät) gespeichert werden.
Erfassung und Nutzung von Daten
Wir erfassen verschiedene Arten von Daten für eine Reihe von Zwecken, um den Dienst, den wir Ihnen zur Verfügung stellen, zu verbessern.
Arten der erfassten Daten
Personenbezogene Daten
Im Rahmen der Nutzung unseres Dienstes bitten wir Sie gegebenenfalls um die Zurverfügungstellung bestimmter persönlich identifizierbarer Daten, die wir dazu nutzen, um Sie zu kontaktieren oder zu identifizieren ("personenbezogene Daten"). Persönlich identifizierbare Daten umfassen beispielsweise folgende Daten (sind jedoch nicht auf diese beschränkt):
Cookies und Nutzungsdaten
Nutzungsdaten
Wenn Sie auf unseren Dienst mithilfe eines mobilen Endgeräts zugreifen, erfassen wir bestimmte Daten gegebenenfalls automatisch, unter anderem den Typ des von Ihnen genutzten mobilen Endgeräts, Ihre individuelle Geräteidentifikation, die IP-Adresse Ihres mobilen Endgeräts, Ihr mobiles Betriebssystem, den Typ des von Ihnen genutzten mobilen Internetbrowsers, individuelle Geräteidentifikationsmerkmale und weitere Diagnostikdaten ("Nutzungsdaten").
Tracking & Cookies
Wir setzen Cookies und ähnliche Tracking-Technologien zur Überwachung der Aktivität innerhalb unseres Dienstes ein und speichern in diesem Zusammenhang bestimmte Daten.
Cookies sind Dateien mit einem geringen Datenumfang, wie zum Beispiel anonyme einzigartige Identifikatoren. Cookies werden von einer Website an Ihren Browser gesendet und auf Ihrem Gerät gespeichert. Die sonstigen von uns eingesetzten Tracking-Technologien sind so genannte Beacons, Tags und Scripts und dienen der Erfassung und Nachverfolgung von Daten sowie der Verbesserung und Analyse unseres Dienstes.
Sie können in den Einstellungen Ihres Browsers bestimmen, ob Sie alle Cookies ablehnen oder nur bestimmte Cookies akzeptieren möchten. Falls Sie jedoch die Annahme von Cookies verweigern, können Sie gegebenenfalls Teile unseres Dienstes nicht in Anspruch nehmen.
Beispiele für von uns eingesetzte Cookies:
Sitzungs-Cookies.
Wir setzen Sitzungs-Cookies für den Betrieb unseres Dienstes ein.
Präferenz-Cookies.
Wir setzen Präferenz-Cookies ein, um Ihre Präferenzen und verschiedenen Einstellungen zu speichern.
Sicherheits-Cookies.
Wir setzen Sicherheits-Cookies für Sicherheitszwecke ein.
Datennutzung
Wir bei Trimecore Sp. z o.o. nutzen die erfassten Daten für verschiedene Zwecke, beispielsweise um:
Ihnen unseren Dienst zur Verfügung zu stellen und diesen aufrecht zu erhalten;
Ihnen Änderungen in Bezug auf unseren Dienst mitzuteilen;
es Ihnen auf Wunsch zu ermöglichen, an den interaktiven Teilen unseres Dienstes teilzunehmen;
Kundendienstleistungen zur Verfügung zu stellen;
Analysedaten und sonstige wertvolle Daten zu erfassen, damit wir unseren Dienst verbessern können;
die Nutzung unseres Dienstes zu überwachen;
technische Probleme zu erkennen, zu vermeiden und zu beheben;
Übertragung von Daten
Ihre Daten, einschließlich personenbezogener Daten, können auf Computer übertragen – und auf solchen aufbewahrt – werden, die sich außerhalb Ihres Heimatstaates, Ihrer Heimatprovinz, Ihres Heimatlandes oder einer sonstigen Rechtsordnung befinden und somit Datenschutzgesetzen unterliegen, die sich von den Datenschutzgesetzen in Ihrer Rechtsordnung unterscheiden.
Falls Sie sich außerhalb von  befinden und sich dazu entscheiden, Daten an uns zu übermitteln, müssen Sie zur Kenntnis nehmen, dass wir Ihre Daten, einschließlich personenbezogener Daten, nach  übertragen und diese dort verarbeiten.
Ihre Zustimmung zu dieser Datenschutz-Richtlinie und eine nachfolgende Übermittlung von Daten Ihrerseits stellt eine Einverständniserklärung Ihrerseits zu der genannten Übertragung dar.
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. wird alle im zumutbaren Rahmen erforderlichen Schritte unternehmen um sicherzustellen, dass Ihre Daten auf sichere Weise sowie in Übereinstimmung mit dieser Datenschutz-Richtlinie behandelt werden, und dass Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nicht an Organisationen oder in Länder übertragen werden, hinsichtlich welcher keine hinreichenden Kontrollmechanismen in Bezug auf die Sicherheit Ihrer Daten und sonstigen personenbezogenen Informationen vorliegen.
Offenlegung von Daten
Gesetzliche Anforderungen
Trimecore Sp. z o.o. kann Ihre personenbezogenen Daten unter Umständen offenlegen, wenn es unter Beachtung der Grundsätze von Treu und Glauben der Ansicht ist, dass dies zur Erreichung der nachfolgenden Zielsetzungen erforderlich ist:
zur Erfüllung einer gesetzlichen Pflicht
zum Schutz und zur Verteidigung der Rechte oder des Eigentums von Trimecore Sp. z o.o.
zur Vermeidung oder Untersuchung möglicher Fehlverhaltensweisen in Bezug auf den Dienst
zum Schutz der persönlichen Sicherheit der Nutzer des Dienstes oder der Öffentlichkeit
zur Vermeidung von Haftungsansprüchen
Datensicherheit
Die Sicherheit Ihrer Daten ist uns wichtig. Bitte vergessen Sie jedoch nicht, dass es keine Übertragungsmethoden über das Internet und keine elektronischen Speichermedien gibt, die 100 % sicher sind. Obwohl wir stets bemüht sind, kommerziell annehmbare Maßnahmen zum Schutz Ihrer personenbezogenen Daten umzusetzen, können wir eine absolute Sicherheit nicht garantieren.
Leistungsanbieter
Wir beauftragen gegebenenfalls dritte Unternehmen und Einzelpersonen ("Leistungsanbieter") mit Unterstützungsleistungen zum einfacheren Angebot unseres Dienstes, mit der Erbringung von Leistungen in unserem Namen, mit der Erbringung von mit unserem Dienst verbundenen Leistungen oder mit Unterstützungsleistungen zur Analyse der Art und Weise, auf die unser Dienst in Anspruch genommen wird.
Diese Dritten können auf Ihre personenbezogenen Daten nur in dem Umfang Zugriff nehmen, der für die Erfüllung der genannten Aufgaben in unserem Namen erforderlich ist, und dürfen diese für keine sonstigen Zwecke offenlegen oder nutzen.
Analytik
Wir beauftragen gegebenenfalls dritte Leistungsanbieter mit der Überwachung und Analyse der Nutzung unseres Dienstes.
Google Analytics
Google Analytics ist ein von Google angebotener Web-Analytics-Dienst, der Zugriffe auf Websites nachverfolgt und meldet. Google nutzt die gewonnenen Daten zur Nachverfolgung und Überwachung der Nutzung unseres Dienstes. Diese Daten werden mit anderen Google-Diensten geteilt. Google kann die gewonnenen Daten zur Kontextualisierung und Personalisierung der Werbeanzeigen innerhalb seines eigenen Werbenetzwerks nutzen.
Sie können bestimmte Merkmale von Google Analytics deaktivieren, indem Sie die Einstellungen Ihres mobilen Endgeräts (z. B. Werbeeinstellungen) entsprechend ändern oder indem Sie den Anweisungen in der Google-Datenschutz-Richtlinie (Privacy Policy) Folge leisten. Die Google-Datenschutz-Richtlinie ist unter folgendem Link abzurufen:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Weitere Informationen zu den Datenschutzmaßnahmen von Google können Sie auf Googles Webseite zu seinen Datenschutzbestimmungen (Privacy Terms) einsehen:
https://policies.google.com/privacy
Unity Analytics
Unity Analytics ist ein Angebot von Unity Technologies.
Weitere Informationen zu der Art von Daten, die von Unity Analytics erfasst werden können Sie auf Unity Analytics Webseite mit seiner Datenschutz-Richtlinie (Privacy Policy) einsehen:
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy
Links zu anderen Websites
Unser Dienst kann Links zu anderen Websites enthalten, die nicht von uns betrieben werden. Wenn Sie auf einen Drittlink klicken, werden Sie direkt auf die Website des betreffenden Dritten weitergeleitet. Wir empfehlen Ihnen dringend, sich jeweils die Datenschutz-Richtlinien aller von Ihnen besuchten Websites durchzulesen.
Wir haben keine Kontrolle über die Inhalte, Datenschutzvorschriften und -praktiken dritter Websites oder Dienste und übernehmen in diesem Zusammenhang keine Haftung.
Privatsphäre Minderjähriger
Unser Dienst richtet sich nicht an Personen, die das 18. Lebensjahr noch nicht vollendet haben ("minderjährige Personen").
Wir erfassen wissentlich keine persönlich identifizierbaren Daten zu minderjährigen Personen. Falls Sie ein Elternteil oder Vormund sind und es Ihnen bekannt wird, dass eine Ihrer Aufsicht unterstehende minderjährige Person uns personenbezogene Daten übermittelt hat, bitten wir Sie, mit uns Kontakt aufzunehmen. Falls uns bekannt wird, dass wir personenbezogene Daten einer minderjährigen Person ohne elterliche Zustimmung erfasst haben, setzen wir Maßnahmen zur Entfernung dieser Daten von unseren Servern um.
Änderungen dieser Datenschutz-Richtlinie
Wir können unsere Datenschutz-Richtlinie von Zeit zu Zeit aktualisieren. Jegliche solcher Änderungen teilen wir Ihnen mit, indem wir die aktualisierte Fassung auf dieser Seite veröffentlichen.
Wir werden Sie vor dem Inkrafttreten der betreffenden Änderung per E-Mail und/oder mittels einer sonstigen sichtbaren Mitteilung innerhalb unseres Dienstes informieren und das "Datum des Inkrafttretens" am Beginn dieser Datenschutz-Richtlinie aktualisieren.
Wir empfehlen Ihnen, diese Datenschutz-Richtlinie regelmäßig auf Änderungen hin durchzusehen. Änderungen dieser Datenschutz-Richtlinie werden im Zeitpunkt ihrer Veröffentlichung auf dieser Seite wirksam.
Kontaktaufnahme
Falls Sie Fragen zu dieser Datenschutz-Richtlinie haben, können Sie wie folgt Kontakt zu uns aufnehmen:
Per E-Mail: support@trimecore.com
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.freeprivacypolicy.com/free-privacy-policy-generator/:
Free Privacy Policy Generator
Our Free Privacy Policy Generator can help you comply with CCPA, CPRA, GDPR plus with the requirements of Google Analytics & AdSense and many others.
Generate a Free Privacy Policy for your site and for your app.
Generate a Free Privacy Policy.
100% Free.
Where will your Privacy Policy be used?
Click all that apply
Website
Privacy Policy for Website
App
Privacy Policy for App
Continue to Step 2 to Generate Privacy Policy
Free Privacy Policy for your site & app
Our Free Privacy Policy Generator includes several provisions and sections to help you effectively protect your customers privacy while limiting your liability, all while adhering to the guidelines of the most notable privacy laws around the world and 3rd party requirements, including:
California Consumer Privacy Act
(CCPA + CPRA)
California Online Privacy Protection Act
(CalOPPA)
General Data Protection Regulation
(GDPR)
Google Play
Apple Store
Google AdSense
Google AdWords (Ads)
Google Analytics
+ Many More
Features of the Free Privacy Policy Generator
1-minute questionnaire, free downloads to your PC, and more.
1-minute questionnaire
Our questionnaire takes only minutes. Start, answer our questions and your Privacy Policy is ready.
Compliance
Our Free Privacy Policy Generator can help you comply with the requirements of CCPA, CPRA, GDPR and others.
Guidance all the way
Our questionnaire is very easy to use and we're always here to help you if you have any questions. Just email us.
Download to your PC
Once you completed the questionnaire, you're free to download the Privacy Policy to your PC.
Free Privacy Policy Generator FAQs
Answers to the most popular questions about our Free Privacy Policy Generator.
Yes, the Free Privacy Policy Generator is free to use. We provide free policies for websites and apps. You can choose to get our premium & professional Privacy Policy that includes more provisions & clauses to better protect your business, website or app.
Yes, we provide the HTML code of the Privacy Policy that you can simply copy-paste anywhere you'd like.
Yes, we provide free hosting for the Privacy Policy we help you create. You can link to your Privacy Policy from any website, regardless of the content management system or websit builder you use.
Yes, you can choose to include GDPR, CCPA + CPRA text to be added to your Privacy Policy.
How the Free Privacy Policy Generator works
Here's how easy it is to create a Privacy Policy.
01
Start the Free Privacy Policy Generator
02
Download the Free Privacy Policy
03
Add the Free Privacy Policy to your website
Sub-policy 1
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 2
https://unity3d.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Legal Information
Privacy Policy Hub
Privacy Policy Hub
Developer Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy governs our information practices for our Developer Services, which includes any websites, where a link to this Policy is provided. Developer Services means products and services intended for a party that develops and/or distributes a game or other app made with and/or using Unity Services.
This Privacy Policy also applies to Personal Information we collect offline, such as when you call us or interact with Unity in person, such as at an industry event or at a place of business.
Developer Privacy Policy FAQ
These FAQs provide a handy entry point to our longer and more comprehensive
Developer Privacy Policy
. They are intended to enhance rather than replace the important notices in the Privacy Policy, which governs our collection, use, storage, and sharing of the information that we collect or receive from you.
Customers should understand that Unity does not provide legal advice, therefore the information on this page is not a substitute for seeking your own legal counsel to determine the legal requirements of your business and processes, and how to address them.
Game Player and App User Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy will provide you with information on how Unity Technologies will collect, use, store, share or otherwise handle your Personal Information that we are responsible for and collect or receive through your use of applications which are owned by third parties but utilize Unity’s technology.
This Privacy Policy also applies to Personal Information we collect offline, such as when you call us or interact with Unity in person, such as at an industry event or at a place of business.
Game Player and App User Privacy FAQ
These FAQs provide a handy entry point to our longer and more comprehensive
Game Player and App User Privacy Policy
.They are intended to enhance rather than replace the important notices in the Privacy Policy, which governs our collection, use, storage, and sharing of the information that we collect or receive from you.
Unity Educational Products for Schools Privacy Notice
This sets forth Unity’s policies and procedures regarding the Unity software products in schools.
Privacy Supplement Statement for Unity MARS Companion App
This sets forth special privacy terms regarding use of the Unity MARS Companion App.
Unity Data Processing Addendum (“DPA”)
This Data Processing Addendum (this “DPA”) is incorporated into and forms an integral part of the Unity Terms of Service. This agreement determines the rights and obligations of each party when processing personal information.
DPA Amendment for EU, UK, and Swiss SCCs
In 2021, the European Commission and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commission issued new Standard Contractual Clauses ("2021 SCCs"). Additionally, in 2022, the UK Parliament approved the UK International Data Transfer Addendum to the EU SCCs (“UK Addendum”). The 2021 SCCs and UK Addendum replace the Standard Contractual Clauses enacted in 2010 (“2010 SCCs”). This is a pre-signed copy of this document which you may download, execute on your side, and return to DPA@unity3d.com.
Technical and Organisational Measures including Technical and Organisational Measure to ensure the Security of the Data
Technical and Organisational Measures (TOMs) are strategic safeguards designed to protect data security and ensure adherence to data protection regulations. These are incorporated by reference in Unity’s
Data Protection Addendum.
Sub-Processors
Sub-processors are third-party companies that assist Unity by handling personal data on Unity's behalf. These are incorporated by reference in Unity’s
Data Protection Addendum
.
GENERATIVE AI SUPPLEMENTAL PRIVACY NOTICE
This notice explains Unity's processing activities with respect to Personal Information collected through users of Generative AI Tools